Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.420

Qualified residential treatment program—Requirements.

A qualified residential treatment program as defined in this chapter must meet the following requirements:

(1) Use a trauma-informed treatment model that is designed to address the needs, including clinical needs as appropriate, of children with serious emotional or behavioral disorders or disturbances; and

(2) Be able to implement treatment for the child that is identified in an assessment that:

(a) Is completed by a trained professional or licensed clinician who is a "qualified individual" as that term is defined under the federal family first prevention services act;

(b) Assesses the strengths and needs of the child; and

(c) Determines whether the child's needs can be met with family members or through placement in a foster family home or, if not, which available placement setting would provide the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment and be consistent with the child's permanency plan.

[ 2019 c 172 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 172 ss 3, 4, and 10-15: "Sections 3, 4, and 10 through 15 of this act take effect October 1, 2019." [ 2019 c 172 s 19.]